Hawaii statutes.
§286-109.6 Limited access to driver's
license anatomical gift data. The examiner of drivers shall adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 to allow an organ procurement organization twenty-four-hour
telephone access to the driver's license database information, solely for the
purpose of determining whether a driver has indicated a willingness to be an
organ donor pursuant to section 286-109.5.

As used in this section, "organ
procurement organization" shall have the same meaning as procurement
organization in section 327-2. [L 1999, c 88, pt of §2; am L 2008, c 122, §2]

Note

Developing an organ donor registry. L 2008, c 165.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next